dev/proper-noun/proper-noun.ne.dix
  <!-- लाल; लाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लाल__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- शम्भु; शम्भु; 1 -->
    <pardef n="शम्भु__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- इन्द्रमाया; इन्द्रमाया; 1 -->
    <pardef n="इन्द्रमाया__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कुन्ता; कुन्ता; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कुन्ता__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- कीर्तिपुर; कीर्तिपुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="कीर्तिपुर__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तुलाधर; तुलाधर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तुलाधर__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धरान; धरान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धरान__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लक्ष्मण; लक्ष्मण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लक्ष्मण__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भक्तपुर; भक्तपुर; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भक्तपुर__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सीताराम; सीताराम; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सीताराम__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्रदिप; प्रदिप; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्रदिप__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रमेश; रमेश; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रमेश__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- महेन्द्र; महेन्द्र; 1 -->
    <pardef n="महेन्द्र__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- प्यूठान; प्यूठान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="प्यूठान__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- धनकुटा; धनकुटा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="धनकुटा__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पटना; पटना; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पटना__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पशुपति; पशुपति; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पशुपति__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हाइजलिन; हाइजलिन; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हाइजलिन__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- बागेश्वरी; बागेश्वरी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="बागेश्वरी__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- भोज; भोज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="भोज__np_nt_nn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- विशाल; विशाल; 1 -->
    <pardef n="विशाल__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- स्याङ्जा; स्याङ्जा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="स्याङ्जा__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- नेकपा; नेकपा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="नेकपा__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रोहित; रोहित; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रोहित__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- पराजुली; पराजुली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="पराजुली__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- लामिछाने; लामिछाने; 1 -->
    <pardef n="लामिछाने__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- मार्क्स; मार्क्स; 1 -->
    <pardef n="मार्क्स__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रागिनी; रागिनी; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रागिनी__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- रामायण; रामायण; 1 -->
    <pardef n="रामायण__np_nt_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सत्यहाङमा; सत्यहाङमा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सत्यहाङमा__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- हनुमान; हनुमान; 1 -->
    <pardef n="हनुमान__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- माधव; माधव; 1 -->
    <pardef n="माधव__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ज्ञवाली; ज्ञवाली; 1 -->
    <pardef n="ज्ञवाली__np_mf_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="mf"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- राज; राज; 1 -->
    <pardef n="राज__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- सूर्यदत्त; सूर्यदत्त; 1 -->
    <pardef n="सूर्यदत्त__np_m_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- अफ्रिका; अफ्रिका; 1 -->
    <pardef n="अफ्रिका__np_nt_an">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="an"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- तारा; तारा; 1 -->
    <pardef n="तारा__np_f_aa">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="aa"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="लाल"><i>लाल</i><par n="लाल__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="शम्भु"><i>शम्भु</i><par n="शम्भु__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="इन्द्रमाया"><i>इन्द्रमाया</i><par n="इन्द्रमाया__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कुन्ता"><i>कुन्ता</i><par n="कुन्ता__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="कीर्तिपुर"><i>कीर्तिपुर</i><par n="कीर्तिपुर__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="तुलाधर"><i>तुलाधर</i><par n="तुलाधर__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="धरान"><i>धरान</i><par n="धरान__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="लक्ष्मण"><i>लक्ष्मण</i><par n="लक्ष्मण__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भक्तपुर"><i>भक्तपुर</i><par n="भक्तपुर__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="सीताराम"><i>सीताराम</i><par n="सीताराम__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्रदिप"><i>प्रदिप</i><par n="प्रदिप__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रमेश"><i>रमेश</i><par n="रमेश__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="महेन्द्र"><i>महेन्द्र</i><par n="महेन्द्र__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="प्यूठान"><i>प्यूठान</i><par n="प्यूठान__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="धनकुटा"><i>धनकुटा</i><par n="धनकुटा__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="पटना"><i>पटना</i><par n="पटना__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="पशुपति"><i>पशुपति</i><par n="पशुपति__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="हाइजलिन"><i>हाइजलिन</i><par n="हाइजलिन__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="बागेश्वरी"><i>बागेश्वरी</i><par n="बागेश्वरी__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="भोज"><i>भोज</i><par n="भोज__np_nt_nn"/></e>
    <e lm="विशाल"><i>विशाल</i><par n="विशाल__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="स्याङ्जा"><i>स्याङ्जा</i><par n="स्याङ्जा__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="नेकपा"><i>नेकपा</i><par n="नेकपा__np"/></e>
    <e lm="रोहित"><i>रोहित</i><par n="रोहित__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="पराजुली"><i>पराजुली</i><par n="पराजुली__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="लामिछाने"><i>लामिछाने</i><par n="लामिछाने__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="मार्क्स"><i>मार्क्स</i><par n="मार्क्स__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रागिनी"><i>रागिनी</i><par n="रागिनी__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="रामायण"><i>रामायण</i><par n="रामायण__np_nt_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सत्यहाङमा"><i>सत्यहाङमा</i><par n="सत्यहाङमा__np_f_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="हनुमान"><i>हनुमान</i><par n="हनुमान__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="माधव"><i>माधव</i><par n="माधव__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="ज्ञवाली"><i>ज्ञवाली</i><par n="ज्ञवाली__np_mf_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="राज"><i>राज</i><par n="राज__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="सूर्यदत्त"><i>सूर्यदत्त</i><par n="सूर्यदत्त__np_m_aa"/></e>
    <e lm="अफ्रिका"><i>अफ्रिका</i><par n="अफ्रिका__np_nt_an"/></e>
    <e lm="तारा"><i>तारा</i><par n="तारा__np_f_aa"/></e>
